Wyoming statutes. Title 8 General Provisions
Chapter 3 State Seal, Flag, Flower, Bird and Other Symbols

§ 8-3-101.
Great seal of the state of Wyoming.

There shall be a great seal of the state of Wyoming, which shall be of the following design, viz: A circle one and one-half (1 1/2) inches in diameter, on the outer edge or rim of which shall be engraved the words “Great Seal of the State of Wyoming.” The design shall conform substantially to the following description: A pedestal, showing on the front thereof an eagle resting upon a shield, the shield to have engraved thereon a star and the figures, “44,” being the number of Wyoming in the order of admission to statehood. Standing upon the pedestal shall be a draped figure of a woman, modeled after the statue of the “Victory of the Louvre,” from whose wrists shall hang links of a broken chain, and holding in her right hand a staff from the top of which shall float a banner with the words “Equal Rights” thereon, all suggesting the political position of woman in this state. On either side of the pedestal and standing at the base thereof, shall be male figures typifying the livestock and mining industries of Wyoming. Behind the pedestal, and in the background, shall be two (2) pillars, each supporting a lighted lamp, signifying the light of knowledge. Around each pillar shall be a scroll with the following words thereon: On the right of the central figure the words “Livestock” and “Grain,” and on the left the words “Mines” and “Oil.” At the base of the pedestal, and in front, shall appear the figures “1869-1890,” the former date signifying the organization of the territory of Wyoming and the latter the date of its admission to statehood.

History.

Laws 1893, ch. 3, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1; Laws 1921, ch. 49, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 111-101; C.S. 1945, § 18-2201; W.S. 1957, § 8-43; W.S. 1977, §

8-5-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to great seal of state, see art. 4, § 15, Wyo. Const.

For provision that the seal of the supreme court shall be that of the state of Wyoming, see §

5-2-111

.

As to forgery, see §

6-3-602

.

For duty of secretary of state as custodian of state seal, see §

9-1-301

.

Cited

in

Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 8-3-102.
Adoption, use and specifications of state flag; penalty for misuse.

A state flag is adopted to be used on all occasions when the state is officially and publicly represented. All citizens have the privilege of use of the flag upon any occasion they deem appropriate. The width of the flag shall be seven-tenths (7/10) of its length; the outside border shall be in red, the width of which shall be one-twentieth (1/20) of the length of the flag; next to the border shall be a stripe of white on the four (4) sides of the field, which shall be in width one-fortieth (1/40) of the length of the flag. The remainder of the flag shall be a blue field, in the center of which shall be a white silhouetted buffalo, the length of which shall be one-half (1/2) of the length of the blue field; the other measurements of the buffalo shall be in proportion to its length. On the ribs of the buffalo shall be the great seal of the state of Wyoming in blue. The seal shall be in diameter one-fifth (1/5) the length of the flag. Attached to the flag shall be a cord of gold with gold tassels. The same colors shall be used in the flag, red, white and blue, as are used in the flag of the United States of America.

All penalties provided by the laws of this state for the misuse of the national flag are applicable to the state flag.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 8, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, § 4525; Laws 1927, ch. 20, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 106-101; C.S. 1945, § 18-2202; W.S. 1957, § 8-44; W.S. 1977, §

8-5-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision prohibiting any military organizations under the laws of the state from carrying any flags of any nationality but that of the United States, see art. 17, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to display of flags at school buildings, see § 21-3-110(a)(xii).

§ 8-3-103.
State historian to purchase state flags; use.

It is the duty of the state historian to purchase not less than six (6) state flags. The flags shall be kept at the office of the state historian to be loaned under rules and regulations he prescribes to any citizen, or group of citizens, of the state for use on such occasions when the state is officially and publicly represented, or when public assemblies or gatherings are held. If any flag is borrowed from the office of the state historian, the citizen, or group of citizens, borrowing the flag shall deposit with the state historian a certified check in an amount sufficient to repair or replace the flag, if damaged or lost. No deposit is required of any officer of the state government who may be called upon to represent the state at any official function.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 8, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, § 4525; Laws 1927, ch. 20, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 106-101; C.S. 1945, § 18-2202; W.S. 1957, § 8-44; W.S. 1977, §

8-5-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-3-104.
State flower.

The

Castillija linariaefolia

, commonly called “the Indian paint brush,” is the state flower of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 9, § 1, C.S. 1920, § 4525; R.S. 1931, § 107-101; C. S. 1945, § 18-2203; W. S. 1957, § 8-45; W.S. 1977, §

8-5-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-3-105.
State bird.

An American icteroid bird (

genus Sturnella

), the bird commonly known as the meadowlark, is the state bird of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 8, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 102-101; C.S. 1945, § 18-2204; W.S. 1957, § 8-46; W.S. 1977, § 8-5-104; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-3-106.
State tree.

The

Populus Sargentii

commonly called cottonwood tree, is the state tree of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 9, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, § 8-47; Laws 1961, ch. 194, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 8-5-105; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-3-107.
State motto.

The motto “Equal Rights,” as it exists on the great seal of the state of Wyoming, is the official motto of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 102, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 8-48; W.S. 1977, § 8-5-106; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-3-108.
State songs.

The march song entitled “Wyoming,” words by Charles E. Winter and music by George E. Knapp, and the song entitled “Wyoming Where I Belong,” words and music by Annie Smith and Amy Smith, are the official state songs of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 103, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 8-49; W.S. 1977, § 8-5-107; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1; 2018 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “Knapp, and the song entitled "Wyoming Where I Belong," words and music by Annie Smith and Amy Smith, are the” for “Knapp, is the” and made a stylistic change.

§ 8-3-109.
State stone.

Jade is the official gemstone of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 2, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 8-49.1; W.S. 1977, § 8-5-108; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-3-110.
Flag code for Wyoming.

The Federal Flag Code, P.L. 94-344, as enacted by the United States Congress on July 7, 1976, is adopted as the flag code for the state of Wyoming.

In addition to specified dates for display of the flag, authorized by Section 2(d) of P.L. 94-344 [4 U.S.C. 6(d)], the United States flag may be displayed in this state on Wyoming Day, December 10, and on July 10, the day Wyoming was admitted to the Union.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 49, § 1.

“Federal Flag Code” —

The “Federal Flag Code,” P.L. 94-344, referred to in subsections (a) and (b), appeared as 36 U.S.C. §§ 171 through 178 before its repeal by P.L. 105-225. See 4 U.S.C.S. § 6 for similar provisions.

§ 8-3-111.
State mammal.

The Bison bison, commonly called the American bison or buffalo, is the state mammal of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 158, § 1.

§ 8-3-112.
State fossil.

The fossilized fish Knightia is the state fossil of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 19, § 1.

§ 8-3-113.
State fish.

The

Salmo clarki,

commonly known as the cutthroat trout, is the state fish of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 19, § 1.

§ 8-3-114.
State territorial flag.

The state territorial flag shall be a flag with a field of blue, the name “WYOMING” printed across the top of the flag and the phrase, “CEDANT ARMA TOGAE” printed across the bottom of the flag. In the center of the flag shall be a shield with a border of gold divided into three (3) parts:

The top half of the shield shall have the numbers “1869” across the top and depict mountains and a train;

The lower left part of the shield shall depict a staff, shovel, plow and pick; and

The lower right part of the shield shall depict an arm and hand holding a sword.

The provisions of W.S. 8-3-102(a) on the display and use of the state flag shall be applicable to the display and use of the state territorial flag.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 61, § 1.

§ 8-3-115.
State reptile.

The eastern short-horned lizard (Phrynosoma douglassi brevirostre (Girad)) commonly known as the horned toad, is the state reptile of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 58, § 1.

§ 8-3-116.
State dinosaur.

A state dinosaur shall be designated by election in accordance with law. The results of the election naming the state dinosaur shall be filed with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 16, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

An election was held in accordance with the statute, and the triceratops was designated as the state dinosaur.

§ 8-3-117.
“Bucking Horse and Rider” and related trademarks.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules regulating the licensing or other authorized use of the “Bucking Horse and Rider” and related trademarks.

Any licensing fees, royalties or other revenues collected by the secretary of state under this section shall be deposited into a separate account. The legislature shall by appropriation authorize expenditures from the account as necessary to defray administrative expenses associated with licensing of the trademark and expenditures required to protect, preserve and promote the “Bucking Horse and Rider” and related trademarks on behalf of the state.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 101, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “into a separate account” for “into an account within the enterprise fund.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 8-3-118.
POW/MIA flags.

The National League of Families POW/MIA flag, recognized by the United States Congress in P.L. 101-355 and other federal laws, is authorized and shall continue to be displayed directly beneath the national flag on state capitol grounds. All other state leased or owned buildings and offices that fly the national flag may also fly the POW/MIA flag directly beneath the national flag on any day upon which the national flag is displayed. Any state agency, board or commission having authority for the supervision, control or management of a state leased or owned building or office is authorized to adopt rules relating to the display of the POW/MIA flag at the state leased or owned building or office pursuant to this section.

Any county, city, town or political subdivision of the state may display the POW/MIA flag directly beneath the national flag on any day upon which the national flag is displayed.

All protocols used in displaying national flags shall be used in displaying the POW/MIA flag. All penalties provided by the laws of this state for the misuse of the national flag are applicable to the POW/MIA flag.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the acquisition, erection and maintenance of a flagpole or the display of the POW/MIA flag where a pole or display of the national flag does not already exist.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 56, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, ch. 56, § 2, provides: “The intent of this act is to remember all Wyomingites who have been or who may be listed as prisoners of war or missing in action as well as to express the state's concern and commitment to these individuals and their families. The display of the POW/MIA flag shall serve as a daily reminder of the state's concern and commitment to help resolve the fates of these persons.”

Laws 2003, ch. 56, § 1, and ch. 198, § 1, both enacted a §

8-3-118

. The provisions enacted by ch. 198 have been redesignated as §

8-3-119

at the direction of the legislative service office.

Federal law. —

P.L. 101-355 was codified as 36 U.S.C. § 189 prior to the revision of that title by Act Aug. 12, 1998, P.L. 105-225, § 1, 112 Stat. 1253; and Act Nov. 3, 1998, P.L. 105-354, § 1, 112 Stat. 3238. For present provisions, see 36 U.S.C. § 902.

§ 8-3-119.
Rodeo as the state sport.

Rodeo is hereby designated the official state sport of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 198, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, ch. 56, § 1, and ch. 198, § 1, both enacted a §

8-3-118

. The provisions enacted by ch. 198 have been redesignated as §

8-3-119

at the direction of the legislative service office.

§ 8-3-120.
State coin.

The Sacajawea golden dollar coin is the state coin of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 23, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 23, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2004.

§ 8-3-121.
State grass.

The

Agropyron smithii

(

Pascopyrum smithii),

commonly known as western wheatgrass, is the state grass of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 151, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 151, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

§ 8-3-122.
State insect.

Callophrys sheridanii,

commonly known as Sheridan’s green hairstreak butterfly, is the state butterfly of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 44, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 44, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 8-3-123.
State code.

The code of the west, as derived from the book, Cowboy Ethics by James P. Owen, and summarized as follows, is the official state code of Wyoming. The code includes:

Live each day with courage;

Take pride in your work;

Always finish what you start;

Do what has to be done;

Be tough, but fair;

When you make a promise, keep it;

Ride for the brand;

Talk less, say more;

Remember that some things are not for sale;

Know where to draw the line.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 4, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 4, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 8-3-124.
State shrub.

Artemisia tridentata wyomingensis, commonly known as Wyoming big sagebrush, is the state shrub of Wyoming.

History.

2016 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 83, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 8-3-125.
Honor and remember flag.

As a symbol of gratitude and respect for the ultimate sacrifice made by members of the United States military in service to our nation, the honor and remember flag, described under subsection (c) of this section, may be displayed at any state leased or owned building or office beneath the national flag on any day upon which the national flag is displayed. Any state agency, board or commission having authority for the supervision, control or management of a state leased or owned building or office is authorized to adopt rules relating to the display of the honor and remember flag at the state leased or owned building or office pursuant to this section.

Any county, city, town or political subdivision of the state may display the honor and remember flag beneath the national flag on any day upon which the national flag is displayed.

The honor and remember flag is the same proportions as the national flag. Its design contains a red field that occupies the top three-quarters (3/4) and a white field that occupies the bottom one-quarter (1/4) of the flag. In the center of the red field is a five (5) pointed gold star with the top point located near the top of the red field and the two (2) bottom points extending approximately one-quarter (1/4) of the way into the white field. The gold star has a white border surrounded by a blue border. Between the two (2) bottom points of the star is a folded national flag. At the top of the folded national flag, extending into the center of the gold star, is a stylized flame with one (1) blue part and two (2) red parts. In the white field below the flag, the words “Honor and Remember” are centered. The honor and remember flag is protected by United States copyright, registration number VA0001670661.

All protocols used in displaying national flags shall be used in displaying the honor and remember flag. All penalties provided by the laws of this state for the misuse of the national flag are applicable to the honor and remember flag.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the acquisition, erection and maintenance of a flagpole or the display of the honor and remember flag where a pole or display of the national flag does not already exist.

History.

2017 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 135, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 8-3-126.
State amphibian.

Ambystoma mavortium melanostictum, commonly known as the blotched tiger salamander, is the state amphibian of Wyoming.

History.

2019 ch. 58, § 1, effective February 19, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 58 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 19, 2019.